Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2308
Board; chairperson; meetings; conduct of business.

At the first meeting of the board, it shall elect a chairperson from among its members. The board shall meet at least once every three months and at such other times as called by the chairperson or by any three members of the board. The majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for transaction of business. The affirmative vote of the majority of all members of the board shall be necessary for the adoption of rules and regulations.

Laws 1955, c. 5, § 8, p. 62;

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 27.